Washington statutes.
RCW 7.115.050

Enforcement by attorney general.

(1) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin any person from violating any provision of this chapter. Upon proper showing, the superior court may grant a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, writ of mandamus, or any additional orders or judgments necessary to enjoin such persons from violating this chapter. For any action in which the attorney general prevails, the attorney general may recover the costs of the action, including a reasonable attorney's fee.

(2) In furtherance of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and ensuring compliance with the public policy of Washington, the attorney general's office shall maintain a current list of any laws of another state that impose criminal liability for the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services that are lawful in Washington and make such list available to the Washington state patrol.

[ 2023 c 193 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 193: See note following RCW 7.115.020.